Utah statutes.
17B-1-615.   Budgets in effect for budget year.

(1)  Upon final adoption, each budget shall be in effect for the budget year, subject to amendment as provided in this part.

(2)  A certified copy of the adopted budgets shall be filed in the district office and shall be available to the public during regular business hours.

